Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.05, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Average daily membership; justifiable cause; strikes excluded. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding subdivision 8, in cases when school is in session but pupils are prevented from attending for more than 15 consecutive school days during the regular school year or five consecutive school days during summer school or intersession classes of flexible school year programs, because of epidemic, calamity, weather, fuel shortage, or other justifiable cause, the commissioner, upon application, may allow the district to continue to count these pupils in average daily membership. A lawful employees' strike is not a justifiable cause for purposes of this subdivision. new text begin (b) For the 2025-2026 school year only, the commissioner must allow a school district or charter school to continue to count all pupils in average daily membership who were enrolled in the school prior to January 1, 2026, and have not reenrolled in another Minnesota school. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from January 1, 2026. new text end